src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/Dem-ann_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Demonstrative - ann - ok :
     ann+Dem+A+Sg: anna
     ann+Dem+I+Sg: anni
     ann+Dem+A+Obv: anni
     ann+Dem+A+Pl: anniksi
     ann+Dem+I+Pl: annistsi
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+Stat: annama
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+Stat: annima
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+Stat: annima
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+Stat: anniksima
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+Stat: annistsima
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+Movg: annaya
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+Movg: anniya
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+Movg: anniya
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+Movg: anniksiya
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+Movg: annistsiya
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+Invs: annahka
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+Invs: annihka
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+Invs: annihka
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+Invs: anniksska
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+Invs: annistsska
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+MT: annaka
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+MT: annika
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+MT: annika
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+MT: anniksika
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+MT: annistsika
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+Vblz:  [annao'ka,    annaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+Vblz:  [annio'ka,     anniayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+Vblz: [annio'ka,     anniayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+Vblz:  [annikso'ka,  anniksayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+Vblz:  [annistso'ka, annistsayi]
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+Stat+Vblz:  [annamao'ka,     annamaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+Stat+Vblz:  [annimao'ka,     annimaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+Stat+Vblz: [annimao'ka,     annimaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+Stat+Vblz:  [anniksimao'ka,  anniksimaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+Stat+Vblz:  [annistsimao'ka, annistsimaayi]
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+Movg+Vblz:  [annayao'ka,     annayaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+Movg+Vblz:  [anniyao'ka,     anniyaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+Movg+Vblz: [anniyao'ka,     anniyaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+Movg+Vblz:  [anniksiyao'ka,  anniksiyaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+Movg+Vblz:  [annistsiyao'ka, annistsiyaayi]
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+Invs+Vblz:  [annahkao'ka,    annahkaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+Invs+Vblz:  [annihkao'ka,    annihkaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+Invs+Vblz: [annihkao'ka,    annihkaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+Invs+Vblz:  [anniksskao'ka,  anniksskaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+Invs+Vblz:  [annistsskao'ka, annistsskaayi]
     
     ann+Dem+A+Sg+MT+Vblz:  [annakao'ka,     annakaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Sg+MT+Vblz:  [annikao'ka,     annikaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Obv+MT+Vblz: [annikao'ka,     annikaayi]
     ann+Dem+A+Pl+MT+Vblz:  [anniksikao'ka,  anniksikaayi]
     ann+Dem+I+Pl+MT+Vblz:  [annistsikao'ka, annistsikaayi]
     
